Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE B. TEXAS WORKFORCE COMMISSION; WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT; EMPLOYMENT SERVICES

CHAPTER 316. VETERANS REEMPLOYMENT EDUCATION AND TRAINING COURSES

Sec. 316.001. EDUCATION AND TRAINING COURSES. (a) The commission shall develop or approve education and training courses for the veterans reemployment program under Subchapter H-1, Chapter 42A, Code of Criminal Procedure, to assist eligible veterans in obtaining workforce skills and becoming gainfully employed.

(b) The education and training courses must provide instruction in workforce skills appropriate for veterans with disabilities.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 361 (H.B. 714), Sec. 3, eff. June 2, 2019.